District of Columbia statutes.
7-3101

Establishment.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish, by contract, a substance abuse program for youths 14 through 20 years of age. The Addiction Prevention and Recovery Administration shall administer the program from its appropriated operating budget.

(b)

In fiscal year 2005, the Addiction Prevention and Recovery Administration shall:

(1)

Provide no less than 400 slots in the program for youth treatment services;

(2)

Provide, at minimum, an average of 15 youth residential treatment slots, but at no time less than 12 residential slots, to be used exclusively to serve 120 youth;

(3)

Provide a minimum of 385 community-based youth outpatient treatment slots exclusively for youth, of which 75 intensive outpatient slots and 125 outpatient treatment slots shall be utilized exclusively to provide a continuum of community-based care services for youth in the care of the Youth Services Administration who are released from the Oak Hill Youth Center.

(c)

To support the infrastructure necessary for implementation and ongoing monitoring of quality assurance for the youth substance abuse treatment program, 3 full-time employees, personnel grade DSS-11/12, shall be detailed from the Department of Human Services, Youth Services Administration to the Department of Health, Addiction Prevention and Recovery Administration to serve as Program Monitors/Coordinators.

(d)

(1)

The Addiction Prevention and Recovery Administration shall fund 2 positions to support the administration, service delivery, and monitoring of services provided to youth under the care of the Youth Services Administration. One position shall be titled the Program Manager, and shall be classified as a personnel grade MSS-13. The second position shall be an Administrative Assistant, classified as a personnel grade DSS-9.

(2)

The Program Manager shall serve as a continuity of care liaison between the Addiction Prevention and Recovery Administration and the Youth Services Administration, and shall be housed at, or report regularly to, the Oak Hill Youth Center.

(3)

The Program Manager shall work closely with the Youth Services Administration to assure that as slots are identified, filled, monitored, and maintained that all services are beneficial to the Youth Services Administration’s efforts to comply with the Jerry M v. District of Columbia consent decree.

Jerry M v. District of Columbia

(4)

The Program Manager shall be responsible for working closely with other Addiction Prevention and Recovery Administration staff to utilize Substance Abuse Rehabilitation Option services.

(e)

A memorandum of understanding, or any other formal agreement deemed necessary to facilitate the implementation of the priority outpatient slots for the Youth Services Administration, shall be finalized and signed no later than October 1, 2004. A copy of the agreement shall be provided to the Council’s Committee on Human Services.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4212, 48 DCR 6981
Nov. 13, 2003, D.C. Law 15-39, § 2602, 50 DCR 5668
Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-205, § 5502, 51 DCR 8441

History

D.C. Law 15-39, redesignated the section as subsec. (a); in the newly designated subsec. (a), substituted “14” for “16”; and added subsec. (b).
D.C. Law 15-205, in subsec. (a), substituted “a substance abuse program for youths 14 through 20 years of age” for “a 2-year pilot substance abuse program for youths 14 through 21 years of age”; rewrote subsec. (b); and added subsecs. (c), (d), and (e). Prior to amendment, subsec. (b) had read as follows: “(b) The Addiction Prevention and Recovery Administration shall provide no less than 375 slots in the pilot program for residential treatment services for youths ages 14-21 in Fiscal Year 2004, with 100 of those slots being reserved for priority treatment of youths in the care of the Youth Services Administration. The 100 slots reserved for priority treatment of youths in the care of the Youth Services Administration shall be available no later than October 31, 2003, pursuant to an agreement between the Addiction Prevention and Recovery Administration and the Youth Services Administration.”

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 3812 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2502 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-105, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5613).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2502 of Fiscal Year 2004 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-149, September 22, 2003, 50 DCR 8360).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5502 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 5502 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-594, October 26, 2004, 51 DCR 11725).

Emergency Legislation

Short title of title XXVI of Law 15-39: Section 2601 of D.C. Law 15-39 provided that title XXVI of the act may be cited as the Substance Abuse Treatment for Youth Amendment Act of 2003.

Short title of subtitle E of title V of Law 15-205: Section 5501 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle E of title V of the act may be cited as the Substance Abuse Treatment for Youth Amendment Act of 2004.

Short Title